Arkansas, session 2025, SB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 27, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-2709. Prohibitions on discrimination and tying of services in
contracts with risk-based provider organizations — Legislative findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Risk-based provider organizations, also known as provider-
led shared savings entities, have engaged in unfair tactics with direct
service providers;
(2) When a provider will not agree to below costs rates for one
(1) service, the risk-based provider organization terminates the direct
service provider’s network status for all other services;
*JMB316*
02/12/2025 4:18:10 PM JMB316

SB221
(3) This practice is often referred to as “tying” or "all or
nothing" and restricts access to healthcare services by reducing the number
of providers available to serve individuals with disabilities; and
(4) These negotiating tactics diminish or eliminate the ability
of the provider to fairly negotiate rates with the risk-based provider
organization.
(b) A risk-based provider organization shall not:
(1) Tie contracting for one (1) service to another service
against a direct service provider’s will;
(2) Penalize, terminate, or refuse network admission to a direct
service provider who agrees to the terms and conditions for at least one (1)
service offered by the risk-based provider organization on the basis that the
provider has declined to provide one (1) or more other services on the terms
and conditions that the direct service provider is not willing to accept; or
(3) Discriminate against or penalize in any way a provider for
exercising the rights under this section.
(c)(1) A violation of this section is:
(A) An unfair trade practice under the Trade Practices
Act, § 23-66-201 et seq.;
(B) A violation of the Patient Protection Act of 1995, 23-
99-201 et seq.;
(C) A violation of the any willing provider laws under §
23-99-801 et seq.; and
(D) A violation of the Unfair Practices Act, § 4-75-201 et
seq.
(2) If a healthcare contract with a risk-based provider
organization contains a provision that violates this section, that provision
is void.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that contracting and negotiating
practices of risk-based provider organizations are negatively impacting the
ability of providers to deliver healthcare services to Medicaid
beneficiaries; that these practices harm access to healthcare to the most
vulnerable individuals such as individuals with disabilities who need
healthcare services on an ongoing basis; and that this act is immediately
02/12/2025 4:18:10 PM JMB316

SB221
necessary to protect the health and safety of the most vulnerable populations
in the Arkansas Medicaid Program being served by risk-based provider
organizations who are restricting healthcare access. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
























02/12/2025 4:18:10 PM JMB316